District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.42

Repealed

Declaration of state of emergency; reduction of minimum and maximum sentences

Repealed.

Nov. 14, 1987, D.C. Law 7-43, § 3, 34 DCR 5287
Jan. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-62, § 7, 50 DCR 6574
1981 Ed., § 24-902.